src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
    LEXICON _N_7_M_e_MF_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg:{-e}{e}´´%>{N}      NOUN7_M_PostBoundarySg_g ;
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg+Voc:{-e}%>{N}ow      Clitics ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_e_MF_M_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Pl:{-e}{e}´%>{N}        NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl/Masc ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_e_MF_F_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Fem+Pl:{-e}{e}´%>{N}        NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl/Fem ;

LEXICON NOUN7_M_MF

    @P.Gender.Masc@             _N_7_M_MF_Sg_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Masc@             _N_7_M_MF_M_Pl_PB ;
    @P.Gender.Fem@              _N_7_M_MF_F_Pl_PB ;

    NIMO ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_MF_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}      NOUN7_M_PostBoundarySg_g ;
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg+Voc:%>{N}ow      Clitics ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_MF_M_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Pl:´%>{N}        NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl/Masc ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_MF_F_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Fem+Pl:´%>{N}        NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl/Fem ;



    LEXICON NOUN7_M_PostBoundarySg_g
    +Indef:0                     NullCase ;
    +Def:h                       SgProximity ;


    ! Subtype: wabiga / wabiyaal, odayga, odayaal
    ! Derivational stem should just be same as lemma.


    LEXICON NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl
    +Indef:yaal                  NullCase/Clitics ;    
    +Indef+Gen:yaalood´                    Clitics ;
    +Def:yaal                    Fem ;

    LEXICON NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl/Fem
    +Indef:yaal                  NullCase/Clitics ;    
    +Indef+Gen:yaalood´                    Clitics ;
    +Def:yaal                    Fem ;

    LEXICON NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl/Masc
    +Indef:yaal                  NullCase/Clitics ;    
    +Indef+Gen:yaalood´                    Clitics ;
    +Def:yaal                    Masc ;

    ! TODO: oday ? 
    LEXICON NOUN7_M_GA
        @P.Gender.Masc@     _N_7_M_GA_Sg_PB ;
        @P.Gender.Fem@      _N_7_M_GA_Pl_PB ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_GA_Sg_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}      NOUN7_M_PostBoundarySg_ga ;

    LEXICON _N_7_M_GA_Pl_PB
        +N+Decl/7+Fem+Pl:´%>{N}        NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl_ga ;

    LEXICON NOUN7_M_PostBoundarySg_ga
    +Indef:0                     NullCase ;
    +Def:g                       SgProximity ;

    LEXICON NOUN7_M_PostBoundaryPl_ga
    +Indef:aal                  NullCase/Clitics ;    
    +Def:aal                    Fem ;
    +Def+Gen:aalood´                    Clitics ;

    LEXICON NOUN7_M_PostBoundarySg_h
    +Indef:0                     NullCase ;
    +Def:h                       SgProximity ;


! TODO: tone?
! Expecting gender morphemes, t/d/k/g
LEXICON SgProximity

                    Possessive ; ! Should there be a morpheme boundary here? 

@R.Gender.Masc@         MascVoc ;
@R.Gender.Fem@          FemVoc ;

+Abs+Prox:a             Clitics ;
+Gen+Prox:a             Clitics ;

+Nom+Prox:u             Clitics ;
+Abs+Dist:ii            Clitics ;
+Nom+Dist:ii            Clitics ;
! break ablaut path for -ii and -u #ablaut
+Abs+Dist+Use/NG+Err/Orth:{X}ii            Clitics ;
+Nom+Dist+Use/NG+Err/Orth:{X}ii            Clitics ;
+Nom+Prox+Use/NG+Err/Orth:{X}u             Clitics ;

+Abs+Close:an           Clitics ;
+Nom+Close:anu          Clitics ;
+Nom+Close:ani          Clitics ;

+Abs+Near:aas           Clitics ;   
+Nom+Near:aasu          Clitics ;   
+Nom+Near:aasi          Clitics ;   

+Abs+Far:eer            Clitics ;   
+Nom+Far:eeri           Clitics ;   

+Abs+Farther:oo         Clitics ;   
+Nom+Farther:ooyi       Clitics ;   

+Gen:eed´           Clitics ;

+Q:ee           FINAL ; ! TODO: clitics?

! Long forms (abs) 
! 1Sg      káyga            táyda
! 2Sg      káaga            táada
! 3SgM     kíisa            tíisa
!  SgF     kéeda            téeda
! 1PlI     kéenna           téenna
! 1PlE     kayága           tayáda
! 2Pl      kíinna           tíinna
! 3Pl      kóoda            tóoda


LEXICON MascVoc
  +Voc:ow Clitics ;
LEXICON FemVoc
  +Voc:ay Clitics ;

! Short forms
!          Subj     Abs         Subj        Abs
! 1Sg      káy      kaý         táy         taý 
! 2Sg      káa      kaá         táa         taá 
! 3SgM     kíis     kiís        tíis        tiís
!  SgF     kéed     keéd        téed        teéd
! 1PlI     kéen     keén        téen        teén
! 1PlE     kayo     kayo        tayo        tayo
! 2Pl      kíin     kiín        tíin        tiín
! 3Pl      kóod     koód        tóod        toód

! Tone test
LEXICON Possessive
+PxSg1:ay´´           PostPossSgGender ;
+PxSg2:aa´´           PostPossSgGender ;
+PxSg3M:iis´´               PostPossSgProx ;
! break ablaut path for -iis #ablaut
+PxSg3M+Err/Orth+Use/NG:{X}iis´´               PostPossSgProx ;
+PxSg3F:eed´´               PostPossSgProx ;

+PxPl1Incl:eenn´´           PostPossSgProx ; 
+PxPl1Excl:aya´       PostPossSgGender ; 
+PxPl2:iinn´´               PostPossSgProx ; 
+PxPl3:ood´´                PostPossSgProx ; 

+PxSg1+Nom:ay´´         Clitics ;
+PxSg2+Nom:aa´´         Clitics ;
+PxSg3M+Nom:iis´´           Clitics ;
+PxSg3F+Nom:eed´´           Clitics ;

+PxPl1Incl+Nom:een´´        Clitics ;  ! TODO: keena? abs?
+PxPl1Excl+Nom:ayo      Clitics ; 
+PxPl2+Nom:iin´´            Clitics ; 
+PxPl3+Nom:ood´´            Clitics ; 

+PxSg1+Abs:ay´          Clitics ;
+PxSg2+Abs:aa´          Clitics ;
+PxSg3M+Abs:iis´            Clitics ;
+PxSg3F+Abs:eed´            Clitics ;

+PxPl1Incl+Abs:een´     Clitics ; 
+PxPl1Excl+Abs:ayo      Clitics ; 
+PxPl1Excl+Voc:ayow      Clitics ; 

+PxPl2+Abs:iin´         Clitics ; 
+PxPl3+Abs:ood´         Clitics ; 

+PxSg1+Gen:ay´          Clitics ;
+PxSg2+Gen:aa´          Clitics ;
+PxSg3M+Gen:iis´            Clitics ;
+PxSg3F+Gen:eed´            Clitics ;

+PxPl1Incl+Gen:een´     Clitics ; 
+PxPl1Excl+Gen:ayo      Clitics ; 
+PxPl2+Gen:iin´         Clitics ; 
+PxPl3+Gen:ood´         Clitics ; 
! TODO: genitive in possessive?

LEXICON PostPossSgGender
 @R.Gender.Masc@    PostPossSgGender_M ;
 @R.Gender.Fem@     PostPossSgGender_F ;

LEXICON PostPossSgGender_M
 :g         PostPossSgProx ;

LEXICON PostPossSgGender_F
 :d         PostPossSgProx ;

! proximity and case for after possessive suffixes
! Need to restrict to prevent loops to infinity
LEXICON PostPossSgProx
+Abs+Prox:a         Clitics ;
+Gen+Prox:a         Clitics ; ! TODO: Gen? 
+Nom+Prox:u         Clitics ;
+Abs+Dist:ii´       Clitics ; ! TODO: check tones
+Nom+Dist:ii´´      Clitics ;
+Gen+Dist:ii´       Clitics ;
+Voc:ow     Clitics ;

@R.Gender.Masc@     PostPossDistVocMasc ;
@R.Gender.Fem@     PostPossDistVocFem ;

LEXICON PostPossDistVocMasc
+Voc+Dist:ii´´yow Clitics ;

LEXICON PostPossDistVocFem
+Voc+Dist+Use/NG+Err/Orth:ii´´yay Clitics ;
+Voc+Dist:ii´´yey Clitics ;


! TODO: more boundaries here?
! TODO: tones
! TODO: -> proximity path? 
LEXICON Masc
+Abs+Near:%>kaas      Clitics ;
+Gen+Near:%>kaas      Clitics ;
+Nom+Near:%>kaasi      Clitics ;

+Abs+Close:%>kan      Clitics ;
+Gen+Close:%>kan      Clitics ;
+Abs+Prox:%>ka      Clitics ;
+Gen+Prox:%>ka      Clitics ;
+Nom+Prox:%>ku      Clitics ;
+Abs+Dist:%>kii     Clitics ;
+Nom+Dist:%>kii     Clitics ;
+Voc:%>kow     Clitics ;
:%>k     Possessive ;

LEXICON MascPl
+Def+Abs+Near:ahaas      Clitics ;           
+Def+Gen+Near:ahaas      Clitics ;           
+Def+Nom+Near:ahaasi     Clitics ;           
+Def+Nom+Near:ahaasu     Clitics ;           

+Def+Abs+Close:ahan      Clitics ;           
+Def+Gen+Close:ahan      Clitics ;           
+Def+Abs+Prox:aha        Clitics ;           
+Def+Gen+Prox:aha        Clitics ;           
+Def+Nom+Prox:uhu        Clitics ;           
+Def+Abs+Dist:ihii       Clitics ;           
+Def+Nom+Dist:ihii       Clitics ;           
+Def+Voc:ahow            Clitics ; ! TODO: ablaut here?
:ah                      Possessive ;
! TODO: too much?
:ih                      Possessive ;

+Def+Abs+Dist+Err/Orth:ahii       Clitics ;           
+Def+Nom+Dist+Err/Orth:ahii       Clitics ;           
