src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON D7_M
  doodaa	NOUN7_M_MF ;
  fiistola	NOUN7_M_MF ;
  heesaa	NOUN7_M_MF ;
  istuudiyo	NOUN7_M_MF ;
  jifaa	NOUN7_M_MF ;
  oday	NOUN7_M_GA ;
  qoraa	NOUN7_M_MF ;
